Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 26. Commission on Early Childhood and Child Day Care Programs.

§§ 30-190,
30-191.

Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 577.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 577, repealed former Chapter 32.1 (§ 9-291.1) of Title 9, from which these sections were derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 577 has been given effect in these sections, which are deemed repealed by Acts 2001, c. 577.

Former § 9-291.1, which created the Commission on Early Childhood and Child Day Care Programs, was derived from Acts 1991, c. 510; 1996, cc. 177, 482, 492.